Texas, session 892, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0091 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0091.  EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN; CAMP STAFF AND VOLUNTEER TRAINING; CAMPER SAFETY DRILLS.  (a)  A youth camp operator shall, for each youth camp owned or operated by the operator: (1)  develop and implement a site-specific written emergency operations plan with procedures for responding to an emergency event, including: (A)  a natural disaster; (B)  a lost camper; (C)  a fire; (D)  a transportation emergency; (E)  a severe illness; (F)  a severe injury; (G)  a mass casualty event; (H)  an unauthorized or unknown individual present on the camp's premises; (I)  an aquatic emergency, if applicable to the camp; (J)  an emergency specific to the camp's location or activities; and (K)  any other emergency event designated in department rules; (2)  at least annually review and as necessary update the plan; and (3)  annually submit the plan approved under Subsection (c) to the department in the form and manner the department prescribes. (b)  The emergency operations plan must include specific procedures for campers, staff, and volunteers of the youth camp to follow in an emergency event, including procedures for: (1)  evacuating from camp buildings and the camp; (2)  controlling vehicular traffic on the camp's premises; (3)  notifying and communicating with: (A)  the local emergency medical services provider, the local fire department, and the local sheriff's department; and (B)  camp administrative and medical services staff; and (4)  reuniting the campers, staff, and volunteers at a designated location. (c)  A youth camp operator shall provide the youth camp's emergency operations plan to the emergency management director or coordinator of the relevant county or municipality in which the camp is located for review and approval. (d)  Before the beginning of each camp session, a youth camp operator shall: (1)  provide to each camp staff member or volunteer comprehensive training on the camp's emergency operations plan, that: (A)  covers each procedure included in the plan and the location of any emergency or lifesaving equipment; and (B)  includes plan implementation exercises and emergency management skills; and (2)  assign to each camp staff member or volunteer specific responsibilities for implementing the plan. (e)  As soon as practicable but not later than 48 hours after the beginning of each camp session, youth camp staff shall conduct an age-appropriate emergency drill to ensure campers are familiar with evacuation routes and other procedures included in the camp's emergency operations plan and the location and appropriate use of any emergency or lifesaving equipment. (f)  A youth camp shall maintain in the camp's on-site administrative office: (1)  the camp's current emergency operations plan; and (2)  records documenting the successful completion by each camp staff member, volunteer, and camper of the training and emergency drills required by Subsections (d) and (e). (g)  The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.